Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-1119.01
Interim-program school, defined.

Interim-program school means a school approved by the State Board of Education and located in or operated by (1) a county detention home established under section 43-2,110, (2) a juvenile emergency shelter, or (3) any institution which is a public or private facility, not owned or operated by a school district, which provides a residential program and regular educational or special education services approved by the State Department of Education.

Laws 2010, LB1087, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 19.